Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202681-1571.01
Property of Department of Natural Resources; transfer to Department of Water, Energy, and Environment.

On July 1, 2025, all items of property, real and personal, including office furniture and fixtures, books, documents, and records of the Department of Natural Resources pertaining to the duties and functions transferred to the Department of Water, Energy, and Environment pursuant to Laws 2025, LB317, shall become the property of such department.

Laws 2025, LB317, § 6.